dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.dic
אוניברסיטת/5079,5084,5192,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,64993
אחרו/5578,5579,5580,5581,5582,5583,5584,5585,5586,64995
אימוצך/64993
אלפקת/5079,5084,5192,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,64993
אספני/5079,5084,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5192,5193,5333,5345,5346,5347,5348,5365,5366,5367,5368,5369,5370,64993
אפנני/64995
אשמאך/64993
בייל/5083,5371,5373,5374,5375,5599,5840,5841,5842,5843,5844,5845,6072,6491,6632,7750,8237,8239,8240,8429,8430,8431,8432,8433,64993
בלפי/64995
בתי/5079,5084,5192,5333,5345,5346,5347,5348,5365,5366,5367,64993
גהצו/64995
גחו/5080,5084,5125,5126,5127,5128,5129,5130,5131,5132,5133,5134,5135,5136,5138,5139,5140,5141,5142,5372,7112,7553,7556,64994
גינת/5079,5084,5192,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,64993
גלפו/64995
גרפיקאם/64993
גשנה/64994
דוני/5090,5632,5634,6317,7547,7548,64995
דיסאינפורמציית/5079,5084,5192,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,64993
דען/64994
דתנו/64993
האהב/5005,5371,5373,5374,5375,5376,5377,5378,5379,5380,5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5394,5397,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,5599,7391,9289,9290,9291,9292,9293,9294,9295,9296,9297,9298,64994
האריכי/5090,5634,6889,64995
הבחל/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5599,6065,8215,9389,9390,9391,64994
הגלד/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5599,5814,9716,64994
הדפי/5090,5369,5370,5632,5634,5830,64995
הדרגת/5339,5636,5637,5638,6622,6623,6624,6625,6626,6627,6628,6629,6630,64993
הוורד/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5599,9299,9300,9301,9302,9303,9304,9305,9306,9307,9308,64994
הזליפי/5090,5634,64995
הזרע/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5394,5397,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,5599,64994
החמיצי/5090,5369,5370,5632,5634,6889,64995
החנק/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5599,64994
החריפן/9366,64993
הטף/64994
היאטמי/64995
היאשמי/64995
היגלו/5206,5207,5208,5209,5210,5211,5212,5213,5214,5939,64994
הידגמו/64995
הידייני/64995
היוועצי/64995
היוועצנה/64994
היחלצי/64995
היחתכו/64995
היטעני/64995
היירי/5599,64994
הילחמו/64995
הימנו/5080,5084,5094,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5125,5126,5127,5128,5129,5130,5131,5132,5133,5134,5135,5136,5138,5139,5140,5141,5142,5193,5372,5636,6023,6024,6025,6026,6027,6028,6029,6030,6031,6032,7112,7115,7116,7117,7118,7119,7120,7121,7122,7123,7124,64994
הימסכי/64995
הינחמו/5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5193,5636,6023,6024,6025,6026,6027,6028,6029,6030,6031,6032,6348,64995
היסתמי/64995
היעקפי/64995
היעשו/5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5193,5636,6023,6024,6025,6026,6027,6028,6029,6030,6031,6032,64994
היפוצו/64995
היקנה/64994
הירצצי/64995
הישאפנה/64994
הישקפו/64995
היתקפו/5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5636,6023,6024,6025,6026,6027,6028,6029,6030,6031,6032,64995
הכחש/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5394,5397,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,5599,64994
הכתיר/5028,5079,5083,5088,5091,5092,5120,5121,5122,5372,5373,5374,5376,5377,5378,5379,5380,5381,5388,5389,5390,5391,5392,5393,5394,5395,5396,5397,64993
הלט/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5599,64994
המשיכי/5090,5369,5370,5632,5634,6889,64995
המשל/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5394,5397,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,5599,64994
הנץ/64993
הסה/64994
העכר/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5394,5397,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,5599,64994
העריצי/5090,5632,5634,6889,64995
הפגש/5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,64994
הפנט/5371,5373,5374,5375,5599,5841,5842,5843,5844,5845,6072,64993
הצהב/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5599,9289,9298,9718,9719,9720,9721,9722,9723,9724,9725,10737,11141,11142,11143,11144,11145,11146,11147,64994
הקהל/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5394,5397,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,5599,11081,64994
הקימי/5090,5369,5370,5632,5634,6889,64995
הקצפת/5008,5028,5084,5192,5205,5343,5344,5345,5347,5348,5388,5389,5390,5391,5392,5393,5707,5816,5922,5923,5924,5925,5926,5927,5928,6822,64993
הקרא/5005,5082,5087,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5394,5397,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,5599,64994
הרעש/5382,5383,5384,5385,5386,5387,5398,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5406,5407,5408,5409,5410,5411,5412,5413,5414,5415,64994
השמיני/64995
השמץ/64994
השתוחח/5083,5093,5183,5184,5185,5186,5187,5188,5189,5190,5191,5371,5373,5374,5375,5599,5840,5841,5842,5843,5844,5845,6053,6054,6055,6056,6057,6058,6059,6060,6061,6062,6063,6072,6632,64993
התאונני/64995
התאחי/5599,64994
התגלם/64993
התחממי/64995
התחקי/5599,6889,64994
התלכלכי/64995
התמהמה/5083,5093,5183,5184,5185,5186,5187,5188,5189,5190,5191,5371,5373,5374,5375,5599,5841,5842,5843,5844,5845,6053,6054,6055,6056,6057,6058,6059,6060,6061,6062,6063,6072,6632,64993
התנמנמנה/64994
התפטמי/64995
התפלג/5183,5184,5185,5186,5187,5188,5189,5190,5191,6053,6054,6055,6056,6057,6058,6059,6060,6061,6062,6063,64993
התקדמנה/64994
ונצואלה/64993
זהמנה/64994
זייפי/5090,5369,5370,5632,5634,6327,64995
זמביה/64993
חומת/5079,5192,5348,64993
חלפה/64993
חרפו/5090,5193,5215,5216,5217,5218,5219,5220,5221,5222,5223,5224,5630,5631,5632,5633,5634,5827,6823,7545,7546,64993
חשפי/5090,5369,5370,5632,5634,6327,64995
טול/5599,64994
טלאם/64993
ידך/64993
יחמי/5248,5735,5830,6209,6792,6793,6794,6795,6796,6797,6798,6799,7114,7137,7139,7140,7141,7142,7143,7144,7145,7148,7149,7753,7754,9915,64994
ישמה/7543,64994
כוכה/64993
כרכן/64993
לגומנה/64994
לונו/64995
לטמיך/64993
מדהימת/5080,5089,5365,5655,6155,6156,6157,6158,64993
מזנת/5080,5089,5365,5655,6155,6156,6157,6158,64993
מלאכו/7242,64993
מעדי/9100,9101,9102,9103,9104,9105,9106,9107,9108,9109,64995
מעריכי/5082,5204,5655,6155,6157,6158,6159,6272,6273,6274,6275,6276,64993
מצנו/64994
משרפת/5079,5084,5192,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,64993
נאמני/5079,5192,5333,5345,5346,5347,5348,5366,5367,5369,5370,5635,64993
נחמי/5090,5248,5346,5634,5735,5830,6209,6322,6792,6793,6794,6795,6796,6797,6798,6799,7547,7548,7753,7754,64995
נסיבת/5339,5636,5637,5638,64993
סיבוכי/5093,5183,5184,5185,5186,5187,5188,5189,5190,5191,64993
סכני/5090,5632,5634,7547,7548,64995
עזכן/64993
עממו/64995
עסו/5090,5208,5229,5235,5238,5630,5631,5632,5633,5634,5939,5941,5943,5946,8198,8390,8391,8392,8393,8394,8395,8396,8397,8398,64994
פוגרומה/64993
פסת/64993
פשטי/7585,64995
צא/64994
צמצמם/64993
קיימן/7212,64993
קלנה/64994
קמרו/64995
רדפן/64993
רנני/64995
רשפן/64993
שא/64994
שמרחומן/64993
שספנה/64994
שפצו/5444,5446,5447,5454,5456,5458,5459,5460,5461,5462,5465,5467,5468,5469,5471,5473,5474,5475,5476,5477,5736,6348,64995
תזת/5079,5084,5192,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,64993
